Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2324
Nurse practitioner; signing of death
certificates; grounds for disciplinary action.

In addition to the grounds for disciplinary
action found in sections 38-178 and 38-179, a license to practice as a nurse
practitioner may be denied, refused renewal, limited, revoked, or suspended
or have other disciplinary measures taken against it in accordance with section
38-196 when the applicant or licensee fails to comply with the provisions
of section 71-603.01 and 71-605 relating to the signing of death certificates.

Laws 2012, LB1042, § 3.